Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Political Party Committees.

§ 24.2-950.
Political party committee election cycle.

The political party committee’s election cycle shall be deemed to begin on January 1 and continue through December 31 of each calendar year.

History.

2006, cc. 787, 892.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Political booths. —

An absolute prohibition on political booths is not constitutionally permissible and charging a higher fee for such booths than that charged other participating individuals or organizations is presumptively unconstitutional unless justified by a compelling governmental interest, and unless it is narrowly drawn to meet that interest. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard L. Morris, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-064, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 67 (12/18/14).

§ 24.2-950.1.
Certain political party committees exempt.

Except as provided in subsections B and C of this section and subsection D of §

24.2-947.3

, any local district, county, or city party committee shall be exempt from the reporting requirements of this chapter. Contributions made by such committee to any candidate, his campaign committee, or a political committee shall be reported by the recipient of the contribution in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The exemption provided in this section shall not be applicable to state political party committees, congressional district political party committees, or county or city political party committees for any county or city with a population of more than 100,000, or organized political party groups of elected officials. Any other political party committee shall be exempt from the reporting and notification requirements of this chapter, except as provided in §

24.2-945.2

, in each calendar year in which it does not accept contributions totaling more than $15,000, or make contributions and expenditures totaling more than $15,000. Any such committee shall be subject to such reporting requirements as soon as it accepts aggregated contributions, or makes aggregated contributions and expenditures, in excess of $15,000 in a calendar year. The first report filed pursuant to §

24.2-950.6

shall account for all receipts and disbursements during the calendar year and shall be complete through the completion date for the report period.

Upon transfer of a designated contribution to a designated candidate’s campaign committee, each local district, county, or city political party committee shall provide information to the campaign committee to identify the contributor as provided by §

24.2-947.4

.

History.

1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-254.1, 24.1-255; 1975, c. 515; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 119; 1988, c. 616; 1991, cc. 9, 709; 1993, cc. 641, 776, 921, § 24.2-911; 2004, c. 469; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, cc. 152, 289.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 152 and 289, effective January 1, 2009, are identical, and substituted “subsections B and C of this section and subsection D of §

24.2-947.3

” for “subsection B of this section, subsection D of §

24.2-947.3

, and §

24.2-950.5

” in subsection A and “§

24.2-945.2

” for “§§

24.2-945.2

and

24.2-950.5

” in the second sentence of subsection B; and added subsection C.

§ 24.2-950.2.
Statement of organization for a political party committee.

Except as provided in §

24.2-950.1

, each political party committee that anticipates receiving contributions or making expenditures in excess of $200 in a calendar year shall file with the State Board a statement of organization within 10 days after its organization, or if later, within 10 days after the date on which it has information that causes the committee to anticipate it will receive contributions or make expenditures in excess of $200 or on which it otherwise becomes subject to the provisions of this article. Any change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported to the State Board within 10 days following the change.

The statement of organization shall include:

The name of the political party committee and its address in the Commonwealth;

The name and business address of the treasurer and his residence address in the Commonwealth who shall be deemed the agent of the political party committee for the purpose of service of process on the political party committee;

The name, residence in the Commonwealth, business address, and position of the custodian of the books and accounts, who works under the direction of the treasurer, and the address where the books are maintained;

The name, address, office sought, and party affiliation of each individual whom the committee is supporting or opposing for nomination or for election to any public office whatever, or if supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;

The designated depository to be used for the receipt and holding of funds and contributions received by the political party committee, in an account in a financial institution within the Commonwealth; and

Such other information as shall be required by the State Board except that the account number for the designated depository account shall not be required.

History.

2006, cc. 787, 892.

§ 24.2-950.3.
Political party committee treasurer requirements and responsibilities.

The treasurer shall keep detailed and accurate accounts of all contributions turned over to and expenditures made by the political party committee, the treasurer, or other officer on behalf of the political party committee, or reported to the treasurer pursuant to this article. Such account shall set forth the date of the contribution or expenditure, its amount or value, the name and address of the person or committee making the contribution or to whom the expenditure was made, and the object or purpose of the contribution or expenditure.Such books and records may be destroyed or discarded at any time after (i) one year from the date of filing the final report required by §

24.2-950.9

or (ii) a period of three years, whichever first occurs, unless a court of competent jurisdiction shall order their retention for a longer period.

All contributions and expenditures received or made by any political party committee, or received or made on its behalf or in relation to the committee by any person, except independent expenditures, shall be paid over or delivered to the political party committee’s treasurer or shall be reported to the treasurer in such detail and form as to allow him to comply fully with this article. An independent expenditure shall be reported pursuant to §

24.2-945.2

in lieu of being reported to the political party committee’s treasurer.

It shall be unlawful for any political party committee, its treasurer, or any person receiving contributions or making expenditures on the committee’s behalf or in relation to the committee, to fail to report every contribution and expenditure as required by this article.

No political party committee treasurer or other individual shall pay any expense on behalf of the committee, directly or indirectly, except by a check or electronic debit drawn on such designated depository identifying the name of the political party committee. However, a treasurer or other authorized officer of the political party committee may be reimbursed, by a check or electronic debit drawn on the designated depository, for the payment of expenses (i) paid by him by cash, check or electronic debit, or credit card, (ii) made on behalf of the party committee, and (iii) fully documented by complete records of the expenditure, maintained as required by this chapter, and including receipts identifying the nature of the expenses and the names and addresses of each person paid by the recipient of the reimbursement.

A treasurer of a political party committee (i) may establish a petty cash fund to be utilized for the purpose of making expenditures or reimbursing verified credit card expenditures of less than $200 if complete records of such expenditures are maintained as required by this chapter and (ii) may transfer funds from the designated campaign depository to an account or instrument to earn interest on the funds so long as the transferred funds and earned interest are returned to the designated depository account, complete records are maintained, and all expenditures are made through the designated depository account.

History.

2006, cc. 787, 892; 2020, c. 349.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 349, in subsection D, inserted “or electronic debit” in the first sentence and in the introductory wording of the second sentence and substituted “cash, check or electronic debit, or credit card” for “check, cash, or credit or debit card” in clause (i); and made stylistic changes.

§ 24.2-950.4.
Information to be included on campaign finance reports for political party committees.

The reports required by this article shall be filed on a form prescribed by the State Board and shall include all financial activity of the political party committee. All completed forms shall be submitted in typed, printed, or legibly hand printed format or electronically as provided in §

24.2-946.1

. Persons submitting the forms shall do so subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

The report of receipts shall include:

The total number of contributors, each of whom has contributed an aggregate of $100 or less, including cash and in-kind contributions, as of the date of the report, and the total amount of contributions from all such contributors;

For each contributor who has contributed an aggregate of more than $100, including cash and in-kind contributions, as of the ending date of the report, the political party committee shall itemize each contributor on the report and list the following information:

the name of the contributor, listed alphabetically,

the mailing address of the contributor,

the amount of the contribution,

the aggregate amount of contributions from the contributor to date,

the date of the last contribution,

the occupation of the contributor,

the name of his employer or principal business, and

the locality where employed or where his business is located.For each such contributor, other than an individual, the principal type of business and place of business of the contributor shall be substituted for subdivisions f and g, respectively. For each such contributor other than an individual, it shall be sufficient to list the address of the contributor one time on the report of receipts.

Upon transfer of a designated contribution to a designated candidate’s campaign committee, the committee shall provide information to the campaign committee to identify the contributor as provided by §

24.2-947.4

.

The report of disbursements shall include all expenditures and give:

The name and address of the person paid;

A brief description of the purpose of the expenditure;

The name of the person contracting for or arranging the expenditure;

The amount of the expenditure; and

The date of the expenditure.The report of disbursements shall itemize any expenditure made by credit card payment.

Each report for a political party committee shall list separately those receipts and expenditures reported to the treasurer or other officer of the committee by any person, campaign committee, or political committee pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-950.3

, and in the case of in-kind contributions, shall set forth in each instance the source of the information reported.

The report shall list separately all loans, and for each loan, shall give:

The date the loan was made;

The name and address of the person making the loan and any person who is a co-borrower, guarantor, or endorser of the loan;

The amount of the loan;

The date and amount of any repayment of the loan; and

For any loan or part of a loan that is forgiven by the lender, the amount forgiven listed as both a contribution and loan repayment.

The State Board shall provide for a “no activity” report that may be filed for any reporting period in which the filer has no activity to report.

It is the responsibility of the treasurer that the report for the political party committee be filed and that the report be in full and accurate detail.

History.

2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, cc. 152, 289.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 152 and 289, effective January 1, 2009, are identical, and inserted subsection C; and redesignated former subsections C through G as subsections D through H.

§ 24.2-950.5.
Repealed by Acts 2008, cc. 152 and 289, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2009.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-950.5

required political party committees to report designated contributions, and was derived from Acts 1988, c. 616, § 24.1-257.3; 1991, c. 9; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-912; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

§ 24.2-950.6.
Filing schedule for political party committees.

Political party committees shall file the prescribed campaign finance reports in accordance with the applicable provisions of this section. The first filed report shall be complete for the entire period from the time the committee was organized or contributions were received.

The reporting requirements shall continue in effect for each committee until a final report is filed.

Political party committees shall file the prescribed campaign finance reports as follows:

Not later than April 15 complete from the preceding report through March 31;

Not later than July 15 complete from the preceding report through June 30;

Not later than October 15 complete from the preceding report through September 30; and

Not later than January 15 complete from the preceding report through December 31, and then continuing in accordance with this subsection until a final report is filed.

History.

1984, c. 480, § 24.1-923; 1991, cc. 9, 709; 1993, cc. 639, 641, § 24.2-923; 1995, c. 785; 2002, cc. 156, 237; 2003, c. 256; 2004, c. 26; 2005, c. 9; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

§ 24.2-950.7.
Large dollar reporting requirement for political party committees.

In addition to the quarterly reports required by §

24.2-950.6

, political party committees shall report any single contribution or loan of $10,000 or more received at any time during the calendar year within three business days of receipt of the contribution or loan.

The report shall be filed on a “large dollar contribution report” form prescribed by the State Board and shall be filed in writing or electronically in the same manner as the person or committee files its quarterly disclosure reports.

Any contribution or loan reported pursuant to this section shall also be reported on the next subsequent report required under §

24.2-950.6

following receipt of the contribution or loan.

For the purposes of this section, political party committees shall report as one contribution multiple contributions from a single source that have been subdivided into smaller amounts or given through different bank accounts for the purpose of evading the $10,000 threshold. A political party committee that receives contributions from affiliated organizations shall not be deemed to be receiving contributions from a single source.

History.

1984, c. 480, § 24.1-923; 1991, cc. 9, 709; 1993, cc. 639, 641, § 24.2-923; 1995, c. 785; 2002, cc. 156, 237; 2003, c. 256; 2004, c. 26; 2005, c. 9; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

§ 24.2-950.8.
With whom political party committees file reports.

Except as provided in subsection B, a political party committee that is required by this chapter to file reports with the State Board, and that accepts contributions or makes expenditures in excess of $10,000 in any calendar year, or that accepted contributions or made expenditures in excess of $10,000 in the previous calendar year, shall file its reports with the State Board by computer or electronic means in accordance with the standards approved by the State Board until such time as the political party committee files a final report. Any political party committee that has been filing electronically, but does not anticipate accepting contributions or making expenditures in excess of $10,000 in the upcoming calendar year, may sign a waiver, on a form prescribed by the State Board, to exempt the committee from the electronic filing requirement for the calendar year. Such waiver form shall be submitted and received no later than the date the first report is due covering activity for that calendar year.

A county, city, or local district political party committee shall not be required to file by computer or electronic means if it files its reports with the general registrar of that county or city.

Other political party committees required to file reports by this article shall file all campaign finance reports with the State Board, if filing by electronic means, or with the State Board and the general registrar for its jurisdiction if filing campaign finance reports by nonelectronic means.

History.

1996, c. 687, § 24.2-914.1; 1997, cc. 364, 392; 1998, c. 416; 1999, c. 864; 2000, cc. 511, 555; 2003, c. 242; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2015, cc. 644, 645.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in subsection B and “general registrar” for “local electoral board” in subsection C.

§ 24.2-950.9.
Final report requirement; transfer of surplus funds.

Any political party committee that, after having filed a statement of organization, disbands or determines it will no longer receive contributions or make expenditures during the calendar year in an aggregate amount exceeding $200 shall so notify the State Board. A final report shall be filed by the committee that sets forth (i) all receipts and disbursements not previously reported, (ii) an accounting of the retirement of all debts, and (iii) the disposition of the committee’s surplus funds. This final report shall include a termination statement, signed by the treasurer or other principal officer listed on the statement of organization, that all reporting for the committee is complete and final.

Amounts received by a political party committee as contributions may be disposed of only by one or any combination of the following: (i) transferring the excess to an affiliated organization of the committee; (ii) returning the excess to a contributor in an amount not to exceed the contributor’s original contribution; (iii) donating the excess to any organization described in § 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; (iv) contributing the excess to one or more candidates or to any political committee that has filed a statement of organization pursuant to this chapter; (v) contributing the excess to any political party committee; and (vi) defraying any ordinary, nonreimbursed expense related to the political party committee. It shall be unlawful for any person to convert any contributed moneys, securities, or like intangible personal property to his personal use or to the use of a member of the “immediate family,” as that term is defined in § 30-101, of the committee’s treasurer or chief executive.

History.

1990, c. 931, § 24.1-258.1; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-921; 2004, c. 457; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2009, c. 231.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 231 added the language beginning “or to the use of a member” at the end of the last sentence in subsection B.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).